src/morphology/stems/numerals.lexc
LEXICON OKTAVIDATLOHKAI   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
 +Num+Sg+Nom:#viđát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Ess:#viđát#lohki%>n K ;
 +Num+Ess:#viđát#logi%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:#viđát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:%>X4#viđát#logi K ;
 +Num+Cmp/SgGen:%>X4#viđát#logi NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Cmp/SgGen:%>X4#viđát#lot NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Gen+Attr:%>X4#viđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:%>X4#viđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:%>X4#viđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com+Attr+Use/NG:%>X5jn#viđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Nom+Attr+Use/NG:#viđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ess+Attr+Use/NG:%>n#viđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc+Attr:%>X4#viđát#lot K ;
! +Num+Sg+Attr+Use/NG:%>X5jn#viđát#lot K ;
! +Num+Sg+Attr+Use/NG:#viđát#lot K ;
! +Num+Sg+Attr+Use/NG:%>n#viđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc:%>X4#viđát#logi%>s K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:%>X4#viđát#logi%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:#viđát#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:%>X4#viđát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:%>X5jn#viđát#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:#viđát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:#viđát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:#viđát#logi%>jde K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:%>X5jn#viđát#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:#viđát#logi%>jgujn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc+Use/NG:#viđát#logi%>jn K ; !Nickel 91 from here downwards
 +Num+Pl+Nom+Attr+Use/NG:%>X4t#viđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen+Attr+Use/NG:%>X5jd#viđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc+Attr+Use/NG:%>X5jd#viđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr+Use/NG:%>X5jd#viđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr+Use/NG:%>X5jd#viđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc+Attr+Use/NG:%>X5jn#viđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Nom+Use/NG:%>X4t#viđát#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc+Use/NG:%>X5jd#viđát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen+Use/NG:%>X5jd#viđát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr+Use/NG:%>X5jd#viđát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr+Use/NG:%>X5jd#viđát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Ess+Use/NG:%>X4t#viđát#logi%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Nom:#viđat#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Ess:#viđat#lohki%>n K ;
 +Num+Ess:#viđat#logi%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:#viđat#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:%>X4#viđat#logi K ;
 +Num+Cmp/SgGen:%>X4#viđat#logi NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Cmp/SgGen:%>X4#viđat#lot NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Gen+Attr:%>X4#viđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:%>X4#viđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:%>X4#viđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com+Attr+Use/NG:%>X5jn#viđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Nom+Attr+Use/NG:#viđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ess+Attr+Use/NG:%>n#viđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc+Attr:%>X4#viđat#lot K ;
! +Num+Sg+Attr+Use/NG:%>X5jn#viđat#lot K ;
! +Num+Sg+Attr+Use/NG:#viđat#lot K ;
! +Num+Sg+Attr+Use/NG:%>n#viđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc:%>X4#viđat#logi%>s K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:%>X4#viđat#logi%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:#viđat#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:%>X4#viđat#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:%>X5jn#viđat#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:#viđat#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:#viđat#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:#viđat#logi%>jde K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:%>X5jn#viđat#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:#viđat#logi%>jgujn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc+Use/NG:#viđat#logi%>jn K ; !Nickel 91 from here downwards
 +Num+Pl+Nom+Attr+Use/NG:%>X4t#viđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen+Attr+Use/NG:%>X5jd#viđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc+Attr+Use/NG:%>X5jd#viđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr+Use/NG:%>X5jd#viđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr+Use/NG:%>X5jd#viđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc+Attr+Use/NG:%>X5jn#viđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Nom+Use/NG:%>X4t#viđat#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc+Use/NG:%>X5jd#viđat#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen+Use/NG:%>X5jd#viđat#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr+Use/NG:%>X5jd#viđat#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr+Use/NG:%>X5jd#viđat#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Ess+Use/NG:%>X4t#viđat#logi%>n K ;

LEXICON OKTAGUDATLOHKAI   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
 +Num+Sg+Nom:#guđát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Ess:#guđát#lohki%>n K ;
 +Num+Ess:#guđát#logi%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:#guđát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:%>X4#guđát#logi K ;
 +Num+Cmp/SgGen:%>X4#guđát#logi NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Cmp/SgGen:%>X4#guđát#lot NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Gen+Attr+Use/NG:%>X4#guđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc+Attr+Use/NG:%>X4#guđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill+Attr+Use/NG:%>X4#guđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Attr+Use/NG:%>X4#guđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com+Attr+Use/NG:%>X5jn#guđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Nom+Attr+Use/NG:#guđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ess+Attr+Use/NG:%>n#guđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc:%>X4#guđát#logi%>s K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:%>X4#guđát#logi%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:#guđát#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:%>X4#guđát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:%>X5jn#guđát#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:#guđát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:#guđát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:#guđát#logi%>jde K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:%>X5jn#guđát#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:#guđát#logi%>jgujn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:#guđát#logi%>jn K ; !Nickel 91 from here downwards
 +Num+Pl+Nom+Attr:%>X4t#guđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen+Attr+Use/NG:%>X5jd#guđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc+Attr+Use/NG:%>X5jd#guđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr+Use/NG:%>X5jd#guđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr+Use/NG:%>X5jd#guđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc+Attr+Use/NG:%>X5jn#guđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Nom+Use/NG:%>X4t#guđát#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc+Use/NG:%>X5jd#guđát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:%>X5jd#guđát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:%>X5jd#guđát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:%>X5jd#guđát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Ess+Use/NG:%>X4t#guđát#logi%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Nom:#guđat#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Ess:#guđat#lohki%>n K ;
 +Num+Ess:#guđat#logi%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:#guđat#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:%>X4#guđat#logi K ;
 +Num+Cmp/SgGen:%>X4#guđat#logi NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Cmp/SgGen:%>X4#guđat#lot NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Gen+Attr+Use/NG:%>X4#guđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc+Attr+Use/NG:%>X4#guđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill+Attr+Use/NG:%>X4#guđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Attr+Use/NG:%>X4#guđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com+Attr+Use/NG:%>X5jn#guđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Nom+Attr+Use/NG:#guđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ess+Attr+Use/NG:%>n#guđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc:%>X4#guđat#logi%>s K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:%>X4#guđat#logi%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:#guđat#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:%>X4#guđat#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:%>X5jn#guđat#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:#guđat#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:#guđat#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:#guđat#logi%>jde K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:%>X5jn#guđat#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:#guđat#logi%>jgujn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:#guđat#logi%>jn K ; !Nickel 91 from here downwards
 +Num+Pl+Nom+Attr:%>X4t#guđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen+Attr+Use/NG:%>X5jd#guđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc+Attr+Use/NG:%>X5jd#guđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr+Use/NG:%>X5jd#guđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr+Use/NG:%>X5jd#guđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc+Attr+Use/NG:%>X5jn#guđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Nom+Use/NG:%>X4t#guđat#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc+Use/NG:%>X5jd#guđat#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:%>X5jd#guđat#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:%>X5jd#guđat#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:%>X5jd#guđat#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Ess+Use/NG:%>X4t#guđat#logi%>n K ;

LEXICON 11TO99F   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
oktaviđátlohkái:ok'ta OKTAVIDATLOHKAI ;
oktaguđátlohkái:ok'ta OKTAGUDATLOHKAI ;
oktaviđatlohkái:ok'ta OKTAVIDATLOHKAI ;
oktaguđatlohkái:ok'ta OKTAGUDATLOHKAI ;
oktaviđátlohkái+Use/NG:ak'ta OKTAVIDATLOHKAI ;
oktaguđátlohkái+Use/NG:ak'ta OKTAGUDATLOHKAI ;
oktaviđatlohkái+Use/NG:ak'ta OKTAVIDATLOHKAI ;
oktaguđatlohkái+Use/NG:ak'ta OKTAGUDATLOHKAI ;
LEXICON 111TO119   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
oktaviđátlohkái:ok'ta OKTAVIDATLOHKAI ;
oktaguđátlohkái:ok'ta OKTAGUDATLOHKAI ;
oktaviđatlohkái:ok'ta OKTAVIDATLOHKAI ;
oktaguđatlohkái:ok'ta OKTAGUDATLOHKAI ;
